Utah statutes.
53-7-207.   Selling or offering for sale nonstandard equipment unlawful --
Exception.
(1)  A person may not sell or offer for sale any fire hose, fire hydrant, fire
engine, or other equipment with threaded parts unless the equipment is fitted
and equipped with the threads designated as national standard and adopted by
the board and designated by law as the standard of  the equipment in the
state.
(2)  Subsection (1) does not apply to:
(a)  equipment sold or offered for sale to a local governing body for the
purposes of maintaining, repairing, replacing, or extending existing fire
protection equipment as provided in Section 11-4-2; and
(b)  adapters and caps for fire protective purposes.
